Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Chapter 05. Jurisdiction.

Sec. 12.05.010.
Crime commenced outside state but consummated inside.

When the commission of a crime commenced outside the state is consummated inside the state, the defendant is liable to punishment in this state even though out of the state at the time of the commission of the crime charged, if the defendant consummated the crime through the intervention of an innocent or guilty agent, or by other means proceeding directly from the defendant.

History.

(§ 1.06 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Legislative history reports. —

For report on original bill, see 1962 House Journal, pp. 224-231.

Sec. 12.05.020.
Offenses committed on aircraft or ferries and other watercraft owned or operated by the state.

A person may be prosecuted under the laws of this state for an offense committed on or against an aircraft owned or operated by the state or a ferry or other watercraft owned or operated by the state, even if the aircraft, ferry, or watercraft is in airspace or water outside the state when the offense is alleged to have occurred. This jurisdiction is in addition to that provided by AS 44.03 and any other jurisdictional basis expressed or implied in law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 2002)

Sec. 12.05.030.
Crimes involving minors committed outside state.

In addition to any other jurisdictional basis expressed or implied in law, a person may be prosecuted under the laws of this state for conduct occurring outside the state for a violation of

AS

11.41.452

if the other person with whom the defendant communicated was in the state; or

AS

11.61.116

if the minor whose image is published or distributed was in the state.

History.

(§ 14 ch 20 SLA 2011)

Effective dates. —

Section 30, ch. 20, SLA 2011 makes this section effective July 1, 2011.